Hawaii statutes.
[§141-2.5] Aquaculture program. (a)
There is established within the department an aquaculture program that shall:

(1) Maintain cognizance of actions taken by industry
and by federal, state, county, and private agencies in activities relating to
aquaculture, and promote and support worthwhile aquaculture activities;

(2) Serve as an information clearinghouse for
aquaculture activities;

(3) Coordinate development projects to investigate
and solve biological and technical problems involved in raising selected
species with commercial potential;

(4) Actively seek federal funding for aquaculture
activities;

(5) Undertake activities required to develop and
expand the aquaculture industry; and

(6) Perform such other functions and activities as
may be assigned by law.

(b) The chairperson of the board may employ
temporary staff exempt from chapter 76. [L 1998, c 176, §3; am L 2000, c
253, §150]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next